New Jersey, session 222, A3593.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. N.J.S.2B:20-10 is amended to read as follows: 2B:20-10.  An excuse from jury service shall be granted only if: a.     The prospective juror is 75 years of age or older; b.    The prospective juror has served as a juror within the last three years in the county to which the juror is being summoned; c.     Jury service will impose a severe hardship due to circumstances which are not likely to change within the following year.  Severe hardship includes the following circumstances: (1)   The prospective juror has a medical inability to serve which is verified by a licensed physician. (2)   The prospective juror will suffer a severe financial hardship which will compromise the juror's ability to support himself, herself, or dependents.  In determining whether to excuse the prospective juror, the Assignment Judge shall consider: (a)   the sources of the prospective juror's household income; and (b)   the availability and extent of income reimbursement; and (c)   the expected length of service. (3)   The prospective juror has a personal obligation to care for another, including a dependent who is sick, is elderly, or has an infirmity or a minor child, who requires the prospective juror's personal care and attention, and no alternative care is available without severe financial hardship on the prospective juror or the person requiring care. (4)   The prospective juror provides highly specialized technical health care services for which replacement cannot reasonably be obtained. (5)   The prospective juror is a health care worker directly involved in the care of a person with a mental or physical disability, and the prospective juror's continued presence is essential to the personal treatment of that person. (6)   The prospective juror is a member of the full-time instructional staff of a grammar school or high school, the scheduled jury service is during the school term, and a replacement cannot reasonably be obtained.  In determining whether to excuse the prospective juror or grant a deferral of service, the Assignment Judge shall consider: (a)   the impact on the school considering the number and function of teachers called for jury service during the current academic year; and (b)   the special role of certified special education teachers in providing continuity of instruction to students with disabilities; d.    The prospective juror is a member of a volunteer fire department or fire patrol;[ or] e.     The prospective juror is a volunteer member of a first aid or rescue squad; or f.     The prospective juror is a student who is temporarily residing outside of New Jersey and is enrolled in an out-of-state secondary, post-secondary, vocational, graduate or professional education program. The student shall provide acceptable forms of proof, as prescribed by the New Jersey Administrative Office of the Courts, that the student is temporarily residing outside of New Jersey to attend the out-of-state educational program. (cf: P.L.2017, c.131, s.3) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.